Massachusetts, session 194th, H3326.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by adding after Section 15ZZZZZZ, the following section:-  
Section 15AAAAAAA. The governor shall annually issue a proclamation setting aside 
the fifteenth day of the Hindu lunisolar month of Kartik as the official Diwali Day, establishing 
the day as a state holiday, recommending its observance by the people as a period of special 
attention in recognition of the Diwali celebration known as the “Festival of Lights”, a five day 
long festival where the third day is a day of thanksgiving and reflection celebrated worldwide 
and by millions of Americans.